Utah statutes.
7-7-20.   Reserve and net worth requirements.

Each association shall establish and maintain reserve and net worth accounts prescribed by the commissioner by rule.  Reserve and net worth requirements thus established may not exceed those required by the Office of Thrift Supervision, the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or their successor federal agencies.



Amended by Chapter 200, 1994 General Session

